District of Columbia statutes.
42-1019

Grantee may execute power without direct reference to such.

Every instrument executed by the grantee of a power conveying an estate or creating a charge, which such grantee would have no right to convey or create unless by virtue of his power, shall be deemed a valid execution of the power, although such power be not recited or referred to therein.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1354, ch. 854, § 1055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-119.
1973 Ed., § 45-1019.